California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) An authorization pursuant to this section shall do both of the following:

(1) Specify what authority
 the applicant or beneficiary is granting to the authorized representative and what notices, if any, should be sent to the authorized representative in addition to the applicant or beneficiary.

(2) Be effective until the applicant or beneficiary cancels or modifies the authorization or appoints a new authorized representative, or the authorized representative informs the agency that he or she is no longer acting in that capacity or there is a change in the legal authority on which the authority was based. The notice shall conform to all federal requirements.

(e) An authorization pursuant to this section may be canceled or modified at any time for any reason by the insurance affordability program applicant or beneficiary by submitting notice of cancellation or modification to the appropriate insurance affordability program in accordance with policies and forms developed pursuant to
 subdivision (b).

(f) The agency shall accept electronic, including telephonically recorded, signatures, and handwritten signatures transmitted by facsimile or other electronic transmission.

(g) For purposes of this section all of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Authorized representative” means:

(A) (i) Any individual appointed in writing, on a form designated by the department, by a competent person that is an applicant for or beneficiary of any insurance affordability program, to act in place or on behalf of the applicant or beneficiary for purposes related to the insurance affordability program, including, but not limited to, accompanying, assisting, or representing the applicant in the application process or the
 beneficiary in the redetermination of eligibility process, as specified by the applicant or beneficiary.

(ii) Legal documentation of authority to act on behalf of the applicant or beneficiary under state law, including, but not limited to, a court order establishing legal guardianship or a valid power of attorney to make health care decisions, shall serve in place of a written appointment by the applicant or beneficiary.

(2) “Competent” means being able to act on one’s own behalf in business and personal matters.

(h) An authorized representative of an applicant or beneficiary of an insurance affordability program who also is employed by or is a contractor for any type of health care provider or facility shall fully disclose in writing to the applicant or beneficiary that the authorized representative is employed by
 or contracting with such a provider or facility and of any potential conflicts of interest.

(i) All notices regarding the insurance affordability program, including, but not limited to, those related to the application, redetermination, or actions taken by the agency, shall be sent to the applicant or beneficiary, and to the authorized representative if authorized by the applicant or beneficiary.

(j) (1) If an applicant or beneficiary is not competent and has not appointed an appropriately authorized representative pursuant to this section or that appointment is no longer effective, any of the individuals identified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, may be recognized by the hearing officer as the authorized representative to represent the applicant or beneficiary at the state hearing regarding a notice of action if, at the hearing, he or she
 demonstrates that the applicant or beneficiary is not competent and that lack of competency is the reason that he or she has not been authorized by the applicant or beneficiary to act as the applicant’s or beneficiary’s authorized representative. The individuals that may be recognized are:

(A) A relative of the applicant or beneficiary or a person appointed by the relative.

(B) A person with knowledge of the applicant’s or beneficiary’s circumstances that completed and signed the statement of facts on the applicant’s or beneficiary’s behalf.

(C) An applicant’s or beneficiary’s legal counsel or advocate working under the supervision of an attorney.

(2) If an applicant or beneficiary is not competent and has not appointed an appropriately authorized
 representative pursuant to this section or that appointment is no longer effective, the hearing officer may allow an individual with knowledge about the applicant’s or beneficiary’s circumstances to represent the applicant or beneficiary at the hearing if (A) the hearing officer determines that the representation is in the applicant or beneficiary’s best interests and (B) there is not a person who qualifies under paragraph (1) that is available to represent the applicant or beneficiary.

(k) (1) A provider or staff member or volunteer of an organization who intends to serve as an authorized representative shall comply with, and shall provide, a signed written agreement that he or she will adhere to all federal and state requirements governing his or her appointment as an authorized representative, including, but not limited to, those relating to confidentiality of information, prohibitions against reassignment of provider
 claims, and conflicts of interest. The department shall work with counties and consumer advocates to develop a standard agreement form that may be used for this purpose.

(2) The standard agreement form developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include a notification regarding the requirements of this subdivision and a statement that by signing the agreement, the individual named as an authorized representative agrees to abide by those requirements.

(l) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed
 to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(m) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(n) This section shall be implemented on October 1, 2013, or when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 23.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.

(a) (1) The providing of health care under this chapter shall not impose any limitation or restriction upon the person’s right to sell, exchange or change the form of property holdings nor shall the care provided constitute any encumbrance on the holdings. However, the transfer or gift of assets, including income and resources, for less than fair market value shall, pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, result in a period of ineligibility for medical assistance for home and facility care, which may include partial months of ineligibility, applied in accordance with federal law.

(2) Any items, including notes, loans, life
 estates, or annuities that are held and distributed in a manner that is not in conformity with the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and regulations adopted pursuant to that act, shall be treated as a transferred asset and may result in a period of ineligibility as described in paragraph (1), as required by Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act.

(b) Pursuant to Section 1917 (c)(2)(C)(ii) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(c)(2)(C)(ii)), a satisfactory showing that assets transferred exclusively for a purpose other than to qualify for medical assistance shall not result in ineligibility for Medi-Cal and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Assets that would have been considered exempt for purposes of
 establishing eligibility pursuant to federal or state laws at the time of transfer.

(2) Property with a net market value that, when the property is transferred, if included in the property reserve, would not result in ineligibility.

(3) Assets for which adequate consideration is received.

(4) Property upon which foreclosure or repossession was imminent at the time of transfer, provided there is no evidence of collusion.

(5) Assets transferred in return for an enforceable contract for life care that does not include complete medical care.

(6) Assets transferred without adequate consideration, provided that the applicant or beneficiary provides convincing evidence to overcome the presumption
 that the transfer was for the purpose of establishing eligibility or reducing the spend down of excess income.

(c) In administering this section, it shall be presumed that assets transferred by the applicant or beneficiary prior to the look-back period established by the department preceding the date of initial application were not transferred to establish eligibility or reduce the spend down of excess income. These assets shall not be considered in determining eligibility.

(d) Any item of durable medical equipment that is purchased for a recipient pursuant to this chapter exclusively with Medi-Cal program funds shall be returned to the department when the department determines that the item is no longer medically necessary for the recipient. Items of durable medical equipment shall include, but are not limited to, wheelchairs and special hospital beds.

(e) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations by January 1, 2030, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations are adopted.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this section are filed with the Secretary of State. Transfers or gifts of assets prior to the implementation of this section are exempt, to the extent allowed under federal law and regulations.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 88.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.1.

(a) The department shall consider, at initial application or redetermination, whether an undue hardship, as described in subdivision (b), exists prior to finding that an applicant or recipient is subject to a period of ineligibility for medical assistance for home and facility care pursuant to this article. No person shall be subject to a period of ineligibility for medical assistance for home and facility care at the time of the initial application or redetermination if the department determines that an undue hardship exists.

(b) An undue hardship shall be found to exist under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The individual has been determined eligible for medical assistance for home and facility care based on an application filed on or after January 1, 2006, and before the date that regulations adopted pursuant or relating to this section have been certified with the Secretary of State.

(2) The deprivation of medical assistance for home and facility care would cause an endangerment to the life or health of the individual.

(3) The denial of medical assistance for home and facility care would result in the eviction of the individual from a nursing home.

(4) The individual is otherwise eligible for the
 Medi-Cal program and unable to obtain home and facility care without Medi-Cal.

(5) The denial of medical assistance for home and facility care would cause the individual to be unable to remain at home or in the community and would hasten or cause the individual’s entry into a medical or long-term care institution.

(6) The individual would be deprived of food, clothing, shelter, or other necessities of life.

(c) The department shall establish regulations, procedures, and forms that ensure all of the following:

(1) The department or county provides a notice of the undue hardship process, at the initial request and the annual redetermination, to any individual who requests medical assistance for home and facility care. The notice shall inform the
 individual that undue hardship shall be considered before a request for medical assistance for home and facility care is denied.

(2) A timely and simplified process is established to determine whether an undue hardship exists and an exception will be granted.

(3) If the issue of undue hardship is considered and found not to apply, the department shall provide the individual with a notice of action that states the reasons for the adverse determination. The notice of action shall specify how that adverse determination can be appealed. Upon the request of the applicant or beneficiary, or person acting on his or her behalf, undue hardship notices shall be provided to the home and facility care administrator in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.

(d) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the
 requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(e) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 379, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.12.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Opposite-sex spouse” means a person of the opposite sex who is legally married to an applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care.

(2) “Registered domestic partner” means a person that meets the requirements of Section 297 of the Family Code and with whom the applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care shares the common residence.

(3) “Same-sex spouse” means a person of the same sex who is legally married to an applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care.

(b) In addition to the requirements of Section 14015.1, the department shall consider, at initial application or redetermination, whether an undue hardship, as described in subdivision (c), exists prior to finding that an applicant or recipient is subject to a period of ineligibility for medical assistance for home and facility care pursuant to this article. No person shall be subject to a period of ineligibility for medical assistance for home and facility care at the time of the initial application or redetermination if the department determines that an undue hardship exists.

(c) An undue hardship shall be found to exist under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care transferred all or any portion of
 their ownership interest in the shared principal residence to
 their same-sex spouse or registered domestic partner.

(2) (A) Subject to the requirements of subparagraph (B), the applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care transferred their ownership interest in resources other than the shared principal residence to their same-sex spouse or registered domestic partner and the value of those resources does not exceed the value of resources that the individual could transfer to
 their same-sex spouse or registered domestic partner and does not exceed the community spouse resource allowance that would be available to that person if they were an opposite-sex spouse. When considering whether an undue hardship exists under this paragraph, the Medi-Cal eligibility determination rules applicable to resource evaluations for an applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care and their opposite-sex spouse shall be used to determine the resources available to an applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care and
 their same-sex spouse or registered domestic partner.

(B) If the value of the resources transferred exceeds the limit specified in subparagraph (A), the amount of resources transferred that meet the limit shall be subject to the undue hardship exception specified in subparagraph (A) and the amount of resources transferred in excess of the limit shall not be subject to an undue hardship exception under this section and shall be considered a transfer of assets for less than fair market value.

(3) (A) Subject to the requirements of subparagraph (B), the applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care transferred their
 income or right to receive income to
 their same-sex spouse or registered domestic partner and the amount of the transferred income does not exceed the amount of income that the individual could transfer to their same-sex spouse or registered domestic partner and does not exceed the maximum monthly spousal income allowance that would be available to that person if they were an opposite-sex spouse. When considering whether an undue hardship exists under this paragraph, the Medi-Cal eligibility determination rules applicable to income evaluations for an applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility
 care and their
 opposite-sex spouse shall be used to determine the income available to an applicant for, or recipient of, home and facility care and their same-sex spouse or registered domestic partner.

(B) If the amount of income transferred exceeds the limit specified in subparagraph (A), the amount of income transferred that meets the limit shall be subject to the undue hardship exception specified in subparagraph (A) and the amount of income transferred in excess of the limit shall not be subject to an undue hardship exception under this section and shall continue to be included in the applicant’s or recipient’s
 spend down of excess income. To the extent that the excess income transferred was the applicant’s or recipient’s right to receive a future income stream and that transfer can be revoked, the applicant or recipient shall revoke the transfer. To the extent that the transferred income stream cannot be revoked, that future income stream shall be considered a transfer of assets for less than fair market value.

(d) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act.

(e) (1) The department shall submit a state plan amendment or seek other federal approval before implementing the undue hardship circumstances identified in this section. The department shall request, in the state plan
 amendment or other federal approval request, that the effective date of approval be retroactive to January 1, 2012.

(2) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, a state plan amendment is approved or other federal approval is obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 116.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.2.

(a) In accordance with Section 1917(c)(2)(D) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(c)(2)(D)), any of the following may request a fair hearing on the issue of undue hardship:

(1) An individual requesting or receiving medical assistance for home and facility care.

(2) A personal representative of an individual requesting or receiving medical assistance for home and facility care.

(3) The facility in which the individual requesting or receiving medical assistance for home and facility care is residing, with the consent of that individual or the personal representative of that individual.

(b) An individual with a pending undue hardship appeal who is subject to a period of ineligibility pursuant to this article shall receive medical assistance for home and facility care for a maximum of 30 bed-hold days.

(c) This section does not alter or limit the right of applicants or recipients to obtain a state hearing in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2.

(d) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.), and any
 regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(e) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 379, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other state law, the department shall retain or delegate the authority to perform Medi-Cal eligibility determinations as set forth in this section.

(b) If after an assessment and verification for potential eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits using the applicable MAGI-based income standard of all persons that apply
 through an electronic or a paper application processed by CalHEERS, which is jointly managed by the department and the Exchange, and to the extent required by federal law and regulation is completed, the Exchange and the department is able to electronically determine the applicant’s eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits using only the information initially provided online, or through the written application submitted by, or on behalf of, the applicant, and without further staff review to verify the accuracy of the submitted information, the Exchange and the department shall determine that applicant’s eligibility for the Medi-Cal program using the applicable MAGI-based income standard.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and Section 14015.7, the county of residence shall be responsible for eligibility determinations and ongoing case management for the Medi-Cal program.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other state law, the Exchange shall be authorized to provide information regarding available Medi-Cal managed health care plan selection options to applicants determined to be eligible for Medi-Cal benefits using the MAGI-based income standard and allow those applicants to choose an available managed health care plan.

(2) The Exchange is authorized to record an applicant’s health plan selection into CalHEERS for reporting to the department. CalHEERS shall have the ability to report to the department the results of an applicant’s health plan selection.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county
 letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “ACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).

(2) “CalHEERS” means the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System developed under Section 15926.

(3) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(4) “MAGI-based income” means income calculated using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code as added by ACA and any subsequent amendments.

(g) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(h) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 18, Sec. 36.   (SB 75)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.7.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for persons who call the customer service center operated by the Exchange for the purpose of applying for an insurance affordability program, the Exchange shall implement a workflow transfer protocol that consists of only those questions that are essential to reliably ascertain whether the caller’s household appears to include any individuals who are potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits
 and to determine an appropriate point of transferral. The workflow transfer protocol and transferral procedures used by the Exchange shall be developed and implemented in conjunction with and subject to review and approval by the department.

(2) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (3), if, after applying the transfer protocol specified in paragraph (1), the Exchange determines that the caller’s household appears to include one or more individuals who are potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits using the applicable MAGI-based income standard, the Exchange shall transfer the caller to his or her county of residence or other appropriate county resource for completion of the federally required assessment. The county shall proceed with the assessment and also perform any required eligibility determination.

(B) Subject to any income limitations that may be
 imposed by the Exchange, and subject to review and approval from the department, if after applying the transfer protocol specified in paragraph (1) the Exchange determines that the caller’s household appears to include an individual who is pregnant, or who is potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits on a basis other than using a MAGI-based income standard because an applicant is potentially disabled, 65 years of age or older, or potentially in need of long-term care services, the Exchange shall transfer the caller to his or her county of residence or other appropriate county resource for completion of the federally required assessment. The county shall proceed with the assessment and also perform any required eligibility determination.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only during the initial open enrollment period established by the Exchange, and in no case after June 30, 2014, if after applying the transfer protocol specified
 in paragraph (1) the Exchange determines that the caller’s household appears to include both individuals who are potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits using the applicable MAGI-based income standard and individuals who are not potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits, the Exchange shall proceed with its assessment and if it is subsequently determined that an applicant or applicants are potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits using the applicable MAGI-based income standard, the Exchange shall initially determine the applicant’s or applicants’ eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits. If determined eligible, the applicant’s or applicants’ coverage shall start on January 1, 2014, or on the date of the determination, whichever is later. The county of residence shall be responsible for final confirmation of eligibility determinations relying on data provided by and verifications done by the Exchange and the county shall perform only that additional work that is necessary for the county to prepare and send out
 the required notice to the applicant regarding the result of the eligibility determination and shall not impose any additional burdens upon the applicant. The county of residence shall be responsible for sending out the required notices of all Medi-Cal eligibility determinations.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if after applying the transfer protocol specified in paragraph (1) the Exchange determines that the caller’s household appears to only include individuals who are not potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits, the Exchange shall proceed with its assessment of eligibility. If it is subsequently determined that an applicant or applicants are potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits using the applicable MAGI-based income standard, the Exchange shall initially determine the applicant or applicants eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits. If determined eligible, the applicant’s or applicants’ coverage shall start on January 1,
 2014, or on the date of the determination, whichever is later. The county of residence shall be responsible for final confirmation of eligibility determinations relying on data provided by and verifications done by the Exchange and the county shall perform only that additional work that is necessary for the county to prepare and send out the required notice to the applicant regarding the result of the eligibility determination and shall not impose any additional burdens upon the applicant. The county of residence shall be responsible for sending out the required notices of all Medi-Cal eligibility determinations.

(5) Subject to any income limitations that may be imposed by the Exchange, and subject to review and approval from the department, if after assessing the potential eligibility of an applicant, which shall include enrolling the individual in Exchange-based coverage if eligible and, if the determination is being made pursuant to
 paragraph (3), initially determining eligibility for MAGI-based Medi-Cal, the Exchange determines that the applicant is pregnant, or is potentially eligible for Medi-Cal benefits on a basis other than using a MAGI-based income standard because the applicant is potentially disabled, 65 years of age or older, or potentially in need of long-term care services, or if the applicant requests a full Medi-Cal eligibility determination, the Exchange shall, consistent with federal law and regulations, transmit all information provided by or on behalf of the applicant, and any information obtained or verified by the Exchange, to the applicant’s county of residence or other appropriate county resource via secure electronic interface, promptly and without undue delay, for a full Medi-Cal eligibility determination.

(6) Except as otherwise provided in this section and subdivision (b) of Section 14015.5, the county of residence shall be responsible for
 eligibility determinations and ongoing case management for the Medi-Cal program.

(7) Implementation of the protocols and transferral procedures in this subdivision shall be subject to the terms specified in the agreements established under subdivision (b).

(b) The department, Exchange, and each county consortia shall jointly enter into an interagency agreement that specifies the operational parameters and performance standards pertaining to the transfer protocol. After consulting with counties, consumer advocates, and labor organizations that represent employees of the customer service center operated by the Exchange and employees of county customer service centers, the Exchange and the department shall determine and implement the performance standards that shall be incorporated into these agreements.

(c) Prior to
 October 1, 2014, the Exchange and the department, in consultation with counties, consumer advocates, and labor organizations that represent employees of the customer service center operated by the Exchange and employees of county customer service centers, shall review and determine the efficacy of the enrollment procedures established in this section.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the
 effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “ACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152).

(2) “CalHEERS” means the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System developed under Section 15926.

(3) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(4) “MAGI-based income” means income calculated using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code as added by ACA and any subsequent amendments.

(f) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(g) The state shall be responsible for providing the administrative funding to the counties for work associated with this section. Funding shall be subject to the annual state budget process.

(h) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 17.   (AB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative October 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.8.

(a) The department, any other government agency that is determining eligibility for, or enrollment in, the Medi-Cal program or any other program administered by the department, or collecting protected health information for those purposes, and the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, shall share information with each
 other as necessary to enable them to perform their respective statutory and regulatory duties under state and federal law. This information shall include, but not be limited to, personal information, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code, and protected health information, as defined in Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, regarding individual beneficiaries and applicants.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time any necessary regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 442, Sec. 10.   (SB 28)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.

(a) The county in which the person resides, except as specified in subdivision (d), shall determine the eligibility of each person pursuant to Sections 14005.1, 14005.4, and 14005.7 and Article 4.4 (commencing with Section 14140), except that the department may contract with the federal Social Security Administration for the determination of Medi-Cal eligibility of persons eligible under Title XVI of the Social Security Act. Upon termination of such assistance, the county shall determine whether the person remains eligible for Medi-Cal coverage under one of these sections.

(b) The department shall institute an eligibility quality control program, to verify the eligibility determination of a sample of persons in each
 county granted Medi-Cal eligibility under Section 14005.4, 14005.7, or 14005.8 or Article 4. 4 (commencing with Section 14140).

(c) A review period shall be defined as one year and shall coincide with the federal fiscal year. The department shall draw a random sample of cases for each period. The random sample shall be drawn to ensure a minimum number of cases reviewed in each county in each review period according to the following:

(1) All cases shall be sampled in any county with less than 50 Medi-Cal cases.

(2) Fifty cases in any county with greater than 0.01 percent and less than or equal to .50 percent of the Medi-Cal cases.

(3) Seventy-five cases in any county with greater than .50 percent and less than or equal to 1 percent of the Medi-Cal
 cases.
